Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.180

Superior court reporters—Qualifications—Appointment—Terms—Oath and bonds.

It shall be and is the duty of each and every superior court judge in counties or judicial districts in the state of Washington having a population of over thirty-five thousand inhabitants to appoint, or said judge may, in any county or judicial district having a population of over twenty-five thousand and less than thirty-five thousand, appoint a stenographic reporter to be attached to the judge's court who shall have had at least three years' experience as a skilled, practical reporter, or who upon examination shall be able to report and transcribe accurately one hundred and seventy-five words per minute of the judge's charge or two hundred words per minute of testimony each for five consecutive minutes; said test of proficiency, in event of inability to meet qualifications as to length of time of experience, to be given by an examining committee composed of one judge of the superior court and two official reporters of the superior court of the state of Washington, appointed by the president judge of the superior court judges' association of the state of Washington: PROVIDED, That a stenographic reporter shall not be required to be appointed for the seven additional judges of the superior court authorized for appointment by section 1, chapter 323, Laws of 1987, the additional superior court judge authorized by section 1, chapter 66, Laws of 1988, the additional superior court judges authorized by sections 2 and 3, chapter 328, Laws of 1989, the additional superior court judges authorized by sections 1 and 2, chapter 186, Laws of 1990, or the additional superior court judges authorized by sections 1 through 5, chapter 189, Laws of 1992. Appointment of a stenographic reporter is not required for any additional superior court judge authorized after July 1, 1992. The initial judicial appointee shall serve for a period of six years; the two initial reporter appointees shall serve for a period of four years and two years, respectively, from September 1, 1957; thereafter on expiration of the first terms of service, each newly appointed member of said examining committee to serve for a period of six years. In the event of death or inability of a member to serve, the president judge shall appoint a reporter or judge, as the case may be, to serve for the balance of the unexpired term of the member whose inability to serve caused such vacancy. The examining committee shall grant certificates to qualified applicants. Administrative and procedural rules and regulations shall be promulgated by said examining committee, subject to approval by the said president judge.

The stenographic reporter upon appointment shall thereupon become an officer of the court and shall be designated and known as the official reporter for the court or judicial district for which he or she is appointed: PROVIDED, That in no event shall there be appointed more official reporters in any one county or judicial district than there are superior court judges in such county or judicial district; the appointments in each county with a population of one million or more shall be made by the majority vote of the judges in said county acting en banc; the appointments in each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than one million may be made by each individual judge therein or by the judges in said county acting en banc. Each official reporter so appointed shall hold office during the term of office of the judge or judges appointing him or her, but may be removed for incompetency, misconduct or neglect of duty, and before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties shall take an oath to perform faithfully the duties of his or her office, and file a bond in the sum of two thousand dollars for the faithful discharge of his or her duties. Such reporter in each court is hereby declared to be a necessary part of the judicial system of the state of Washington.

[ 1992 c 189 s 6; 1991 c 363 s 2; 1990 c 186 s 3; 1989 c 328 s 4; 1988 c 66 s 3; 1987 c 323 s 4; 1957 c 244 s 1; 1945 c 154 s 1; 1943 c 69 s 1; 1921 c 42 s 1; 1913 c 126 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 42-1. Formerly RCW 2.32.180, 2.32.190.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1992 c 189: See note following RCW 2.08.061.

Purpose—1991 c 363: "The purposes of this act are to eliminate the use of formal county classes and substitute the use of the most current county population figures to distinguish counties. In addition, certain old statutes that reference county class, but no longer are followed, are repealed or amended to conform with current practices." [ 1991 c 363 s 1.]

Captions not law—1991 c 363: "Section headings as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1991 c 363 s 168.]